en: Chair & Sofa Cushions
xx: Chair & Sofa Cushions
cs: Polštářky na křesla a pohovky
da: Puder til stole og sofaer
de: Sitzpolster
es: Cojines para sillas y sofás
fr: Coussins pour fauteuils et canapés
it: Cuscini per sedie
ja: 座布団・クッション
nl: Stoelkussens
no: Stol- og sofaputer
pl: Poduszki na krzesła i sofy
pt: Almofadas para poltronas e sofás
ru: Подушки для кресел
sv: Stols- och soffdynor
tr: Sandalye ve Koltuk Minderleri

en: Clock Parts
xx: Clock Parts
cs: Hodinové součástky
da: Urdele
de: Uhrbauteile
es: Piezas de reloj
fr: Pièces d'horloges
it: Componenti di orologi
ja: 時計部品
nl: Klokonderdelen
no: Klokkedeler
pl: Części zegarów
pt: Peças de relógios
ru: Детали для часов
sv: Klockdelar
tr: Saat Parçaları

en: Clocks
xx: Clocks
cs: Hodiny
da: Ure
de: Uhren
es: Relojes
fr: Horloges
it: Orologi
ja: 時計
nl: Klokken
no: Klokker
pl: Zegary
pt: Relógios
ru: Домашние и офисные часы
sv: Klockor
tr: Saatler

en: Alarm Clocks
xx: Alarm Clocks
cs: Budíky
da: Vækkeure
de: Wecker
es: Despertadores
fr: Réveils, Radio-réveil, Réveil matin, Radios-réveils
it: Sveglie
ja: 目覚まし時計
nl: Wekkers
no: Vekkeklokker
pl: Budziki
pt: Despertadores
ru: Будильники
sv: Alarmklockor
tr: Çalar Saatler

en: Desk & Shelf Clocks
xx: Desk & Shelf Clocks
cs: Hodiny na stůl a polici
da: Ure til skriveborde og hylder
de: Tisch- und Regaluhren
es: Relojes de escritorio y estantería
fr: Horloges de bureau et de cheminée
it: Orologi da scrivania e scaffale
ja: 置き時計
nl: Tafelklokken
no: Skrivebords- og hylleklokker
pl: Zegary biurkowe
pt: Relógios de mesa e prateleira
ru: Настольные и каминные часы
sv: Bords- och hyllklockor
tr: Masaüstü Saatler ve Raf Saatleri

en: Floor & Grandfather Clocks
xx: Floor & Grandfather Clocks
cs: Starožitné hodiny
da: Standerure og bornholmerure
de: Standuhren
es: Relojes de pie
fr: Horloges de parquet
it: Pendole\, orologi a pendolo
ja: 振り子時計
nl: Grootvaders klokken
no: Gulv- og bestefarsklokker
pl: Zegary stojące i wahadłowe
pt: Relógios de pêndulo
ru: Напольные часы и часовые шкафы
sv: Golvklockor och moraklockor
tr: Yer Saatleri ve Antika Saatler

en: Wall Clocks
xx: Wall Clocks
cs: Nástěnné hodiny
da: Vægure
de: Wanduhren
es: Relojes de pared
fr: Horloges murales
it: Orologi da parete
ja: 壁掛け時計
nl: Wandklokken
no: Veggklokker
pl: Zegary naścienne
pt: Relógios de parede
ru: Настенные часы
sv: Väggklockor
tr: Duvar Saatleri

en: Coat & Hat Racks
xx: Coat & Hat Racks
cs: Věšáky na kabáty a klobouky
da: Knagerækker og stumtjenere
de: Garderoben
es: Percheros para sombreros y abrigos
fr: Porte-manteaux et porte-chapeaux, Porte-manteaux sur pied, Patère
it: Appendiabiti e appendicappelli
ja: コートハンガー
nl: Kapstokken voor jassen en hoeden
no: Frakke- og hattehengere
pl: Półki do przedpokoju
pt: Cabideiros e porta-chapéus
ru: Вешалки для шляп и плащей
sv: Garderobsstativ och klädhängare
tr: Mont ve Şapka Askılıkları

en: Decorative Bells
xx: Decorative Bells
cs: Dekorativní zvonky
da: Pynteklokker
de: Zierglocken
es: Campanas decorativas
fr: Cloches décoratives
it: Campane decorative
ja: 飾りベル
nl: Decoratieve bellen
no: Pyntebjeller
pl: Dzwonki dekoracyjne
pt: Sinos decorativos
ru: Декоративные колокольчики
sv: Dekorativa klockor
tr: Dekoratif Ziller

en: Decorative Bottles
xx: Decorative Bottles
cs: Dekorativní lahve
da: Dekorative flasker
de: Dekorative Flaschen
es: Botellas decorativas
fr: Bouteilles décoratives
it: Bottiglie decorative
ja: 飾りボトル
nl: Sierflessen
no: Dekorative flasker
pl: Butelki ozdobne
pt: Garrafas decorativas
ru: Декоративные бутылки
sv: Dekorativa flaskor
tr: Dekoratif Şişeler

en: Decorative Bowls
xx: Decorative Bowls
cs: Dekorativní mísy
da: Dekorative skåle
de: Schalen
es: Boles decorativos
fr: Saladiers décoratifs
it: Ciotole decorative
ja: 飾りボウル
nl: Decoratieve schalen
no: Dekorative boller
pl: Półmiski ozdobne
pt: Tigelas decorativas
ru: Декоративные чаши
sv: Dekorativa skålar
tr: Dekoratif Kaplar

en: Decorative Jars
xx: Decorative Jars
cs: Dekorativní sklenice
da: Dekorative krukker
de: Dekorative Gefäße
es: Jarrones decorativos
fr: Pots décoratifs
it: Caraffe decorative
ja: 飾り瓶
nl: Decoratieve potten
no: Dekorative krukker
pl: Słoje ozdobne
pt: Potes decorativos
ru: Декоративные банки
sv: Dekorativa burkar
tr: Dekoratif Kavanozlar

en: Decorative Plaques
xx: Decorative Plaques
cs: Dekorativní plakety
da: Dekorative tavler
de: Ziertafeln
es: Placas decorativas
fr: Plaques décoratives
it: Targhe decorative
ja: 飾り額
nl: Decoratiebordjes
no: Plaketter
pl: Tablice pamiątkowe
pt: Decorative Plaques
ru: Декоративные таблички
sv: Minnesplattor
tr: Süs Tabakları ve Levhaları

en: Decorative Plates
xx: Decorative Plates
cs: Dekorativní talíře
da: Dekorative tallerkener
de: Dekorteller
es: Platos decorativos
fr: Assiettes décoratives
it: Targhette e piatti decorativi
ja: 飾り皿
nl: Decoratieve borden
no: Dekorative tallerkener
pl: Talerze ozdobne
pt: Pratos decorativos
ru: Декоративные тарелки
sv: Dekorativa tallrikar
tr: Dekoratif Tabaklar

en: Decorative Trays
xx: Decorative Trays
cs: Dekorativní podnosy
da: Dekorative bakker
de: Tabletts
es: Bandejas decorativas
fr: Plateaux décoratifs
it: Vassoi decorativi
ja: 飾りトレー
nl: Sierschalen
no: Dekorative fat
pl: Tace ozdobne
pt: Travessas decorativas
ru: Декоративные подносы
sv: Dekorativa brickor
tr: Dekoratif Tepsiler

en: Door Mats
xx: Door Mats
cs: Rohožky
da: Dørmåtter
de: Fußmatten
es: Felpudos
fr: Paillassons, Paillasson
it: Zerbini
ja: ドアマット
nl: Deurmatten
no: Dørmatter
pl: Wycieraczki
pt: Capachos
ru: Придверные коврики
sv: Dörrmattor
tr: Kapı Önü Paspasları

en: Dreamcatchers
xx: Dreamcatchers
cs: Lapače snů
da: Drømmefangere
de: Traumfänger
es: Atrapasueños
fr: Capteurs de rêves
it: Acchiappasogni
ja: ドリームキャッチャー
nl: Dromenvangers
no: Drømmefangere
pl: Łapacze snów
pt: Apanhadores de sonhos
ru: Ловцы снов
sv: Drömfångare
tr: Düş Kapanları

en: Dried Flowers
xx: Dried Flowers
cs: Sušené květiny
da: Tørrede blomster
de: Trockenblumen
es: Flores secas
fr: Fleurs séchées
it: Fiori secchi
ja: ドライフラワー
nl: Droogbloemen
no: Tørkede blomster
pl: Kwiaty suszone
pt: Flores secas
ru: Высушенные цветы
sv: Torkade blommor
tr: Kurutulmuş Çiçekler

en: Ecospheres
xx: Ecospheres
cs: Ekosféry
da: Økosfære
de: Ecosphere-Kugeln
es: Ecosferas
fr: Écosphères
it: Ecosfere
ja: エコスフィア
nl: Ecosferen
no: Økosfærer
pl: Ekokule
pt: Ecosferas
ru: Декоративные экосферы
sv: Ekosfärer
tr: Ekosferler

en: Figurines
xx: Figurines
cs: Figurky
da: Statuetter
de: Figuren zur Dekoration
es: Figuritas
fr: Figurines
it: Statuine
ja: 置物
nl: Beeldjes
no: Statuetter
pl: Figurki
pt: Estatuetas
ru: Статуэтки
sv: Statyetter
tr: Heykelcikler